Massachusetts, session 194th, H5176.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sections:-
Section 38. For the purposes of sections 38 and 39, inclusive, the following terms shall
have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“District of residence”, shall mean the school district of the city or town where a student
resides.
“School of residence”, shall mean the middle school or junior high school a student
attends within their district of residence.
Section 39. (a) The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and
implement policies and promulgate regulations to promote, enhance, and expand vocational-
technical education programs, as defined in Chapter 74 of the General Laws, in the
commonwealth.
of 6

(b) The department shall:
(i) oversee all Chapter 74 approved programs and ensure compliance with M.G.L.
Chapter 74 and related regulations;
(ii) work to increase awareness of vocational-technical education and career opportunities
among students in elementary schools, junior high schools, and middle schools;
(iii) ensure that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are provided reasonable access
during the school day at schools of residence to meet with all students and distribute information
about vocational-technical education and careers to said students, including English language
learners,
students with disabilities, students of color, and other student populations, to ensure that
such information is provided equitably to all learners;
(iv) ensure that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are given the opportunity during
the school day to host middle school tours, with transportation costs paid by the school hosting
the tour, for all middle school students in member communities, including English language
learners, students with disabilities, students of color, and other student populations to ensure that
such opportunities are provided equitably to all learners; and further ensure that the school of
residence may not count middle school student tours of vocational schools or programs during
the school day as unexcused absences if the vocational school or program confirms the student's
participation, and may not unreasonably withhold student access to tours of vocational schools
and programs during the school day.
of 6

(v) require that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are given the opportunity to
provide middle and junior high school students with information about vocational-technical
programs and careers through mail and email.
(vi) require all middle schools and junior high schools in member communities to
establish and implement a Chapter 74 Access Policy, in accordance with state requirements
promoting equitable access to Chapter 74 programs, outlining specific ways in which the middle
schools will collaborate with regional vocational-technical high schools and agricultural high
schools to: provide staff members from Chapter 74 schools with direct school day access to all
middle school students, to inform them about opportunities in vocational-technical and
agricultural education and to distribute materials about such opportunities to them; provide all
middle school students an opportunity to tour, during regular middle school hours, the regional
vocational-
technical high school and/or county agricultural school of which the middle school’s city
or town is a member, with the transportation costs of all such tours being borne by the school
hosting the tours; provide contact information for all seventh grade and eighth-grade middle
school students, including a student’s name and mailing address, a student’s personal email
address, and the parent’s/guardian’s email address by October 15 of each school year;
(vii) establish, in addition to the minimum requirements outlined in the preceding
subsections, such additional requirements for Chapter 74 Access Policies as the office deems
reasonable and necessary to promote equitable access by all students to information about
vocational-technical and agricultural education;
of 6

(viii) require all sending school districts which are members of a regional-vocational
school district or whose community is located in the county or district of an agricultural high
school to submit the Chapter 74 Access Policy annually to the department; annually attest in
writing that the Chapter 74 Access Policy is being implemented equitably and that all students
are being provided with information, access, and tours in accordance with this section and with
federal and state civil rights laws, regulations, and policies; and post the Chapter 74 Access
Policy on its district website and provide written copies to students and parents, upon request;
(ix) create a mechanism to enforce timely implementation of Chapter 74 Access Policies;
(x) establish a system to ensure that students who live in communities that are not
members of or affiliated with a regional vocational-technical high school district or agricultural
high school annually are provided with information about their high school options, including
their option to seek an education in a vocational-technical or agricultural high school;
(xi) provide technical support to schools seeking to offer Chapter 74 programs that meet
regional labor market demands and do not duplicate existing programs in the region;
(xii) support the continuation of state grant programs that provide funding for equipment
purchases and facility expansion; and
(xiii) support the continuation of demonstration programs that provide opportunities in
vocational-technical education for students unable to secure a seat in an approved Chapter 74
program due to lack of enrollment capacity.
of 6

SECTION 2. Chapter 70B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
Section 1A(b), as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
(b) The authority shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson, the
secretary of administration and finance, the commissioner of education, and 4 additional
members appointed by the state treasurer, 2 of whom shall have practical experience in
educational facilities planning, school building construction, or architecture and school design, 1
of whom shall be a person in the field of education with demonstrated knowledge of
Massachusetts curriculum frameworks and other relevant federal and state educational standards,
and 1 of whom shall be a person in the field of vocational education with demonstrated
knowledge of Massachusetts Chapter 74 vocational education curriculum frameworks and other
relevant federal and state vocational educational standards, each of whom shall serve a term of 2
years; but, a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. An
appointed member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment. The authority shall
annually elect 1 of its members to serve as vice-chairperson. Each member of the authority
serving ex officio may appoint a designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30.
SECTION 3. Section 3A of Chapter 70B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the number “17” and inserting “19” in place
thereof, and further by inserting, after “Fire Chiefs' Association of Massachusetts, Inc.” the
following:- “,Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc., Alliance for
Vocational Technical Education,”.
of 6

SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of section 14B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and
inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:-
“Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a city or town may
simultaneously be a member of a vocational regional school district and any other type of
regional school district. A city or town that belongs to a regional vocational school district may
100 offer a vocational technical education program in its municipal high school; provided, however,
101 that the program is approved under section 2 of chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided,
102 further, that a vocational regional school district and any other type of regional school district
103 serving the same town shall collaborate through the office of career technical education in
104 offering reciprocal non-competitive programs under chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided,
105 further, that there is demonstrated student and labor market demand for said program as
106 determined by the Regional Labor Market Blueprint and the regional vocational-technical school
107 district is unable or unwilling to meet said demand.”
of 6